apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="ag/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>I</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>you</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>he</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>she</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>they</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>you</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>him</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>her</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>them</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
      <e>
        <i/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>me</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>you</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>him</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>her</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>it</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>us</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>them</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>this</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>these</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>that</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>those</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ouml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ö</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uuml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ü</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ue</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="o_ou">
      <e c="en_GB, en_CA, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>ou</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z_s">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_ae">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>ae</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_oe">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="organi/ze__vblex">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      <par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e>      <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaemia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaesthesia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="feces"><i>f</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ces</i><par n="personnel__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foetus"><i>f</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>tus</i><par n="access__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="honour"><i>hon</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="honour"><i>hon</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="humour"><i>hum</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="humour"><i>hum</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="colonising"><i>coloni</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="organisation"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organiser"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="reorganisation"><i>reorgani</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vigour"><i>vig</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="watercolour"><i>watercol</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="aesthetic"><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthetic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organisational"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mediaeval"><i>medi</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>val</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="savoury"><i>sav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ry</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="odourless"><i>od</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rless</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rumour"><i>rum</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="age"><i>ag</i><par n="ag/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaesthetise"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>stheti</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="carry out"><i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="centralize"><i>centrali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="formalize"><i>formali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="give up"><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="line up"><i>lin</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="materialize"><i>materiali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="optimize"><i>optimi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pick up"><i>pick</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pull out"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="reorganize"><i>reorgani</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="stir up"><i>stir</i><par n="occur__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take out"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="trace back"><i>trac</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="turn off"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="sterilise"><i>sterili</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="revise"><i>revi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="galvanise"><i>galvani</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="visualise"><i>visuali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="commercialise"><i>commerciali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sensitise"><i>sensiti</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="take for granted"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>for<b/>granted</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>granted</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte">      <i/>      <par n="prsubj__prn"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte">      <i/>      <par n="probj__prn"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Tönis"><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Pöttering"><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="bring down"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex" sa="sep" />         <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>       <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="honourable"><i>hon</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="popularize"><i>populari</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>     </e>
<e lm="get across"><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
